es: Tipo de zoom: Digital; Óptico; Otros
ro-RO: Tipul de zoom: Digital; Optic; Altele
tr: Yakınlaştırma türü: Dijital; Optik; Diğer
zh-CN: 变焦类型: 数字化; 光学; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta zumiranja: Digitalni; Optički; Ostalo
it: Tipo di zoom: Digitale; Ottico; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta povečave: Digitalno; Optično; Drugo
sv: Zoomtype: Digital; Optisk; Övrigt
zh-TW: 變焦類型: 數位; 光學; 其他
en: Zoom type: Digital; Optical; Other
lt-LT: Priartinimo tipas: Skaitmeninis; Optinis; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de zoom: Digital; Ótico; Outro
fi: Zoomityyppi: Digitaalinen; Optinen; Muu
ko: 줌 유형: 디지털; 광학; 기타
cs: Typ zoomu: Digitální; Optická; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип увеличение: Цифрово; Оптично; Други
ja: ズームタイプ: デジタル; 光学式; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de zoom: Digital; Óptica; Outro
vi: Loại thu phóng: Kỹ thuật số; Quang học; Khác
th: ประเภทการซูม: ดิจิทัล; ออปติคัล; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ powiększenia: Cyfrowe; Optyczne; Inne
ru: Тип увеличения: Цифровой; Оптический; Другой
nb: Zoomtype: Digital; Optisk; Annet
hu: Zoom típusa: Digitális; Optikai; Egyéb
fr: Type de zoom: Numérique; Optique; Autre
da: Zoomtype: Digital; Optisk; Andet
el: Τύπος ζουμ: Ψηφιακό; Οπτικό καλώδιο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ priblíženia: Digitálny; Optický; Iné
de: Zoomtyp: Digital; Optisch; Sonstiges
nl: Type zoom: Digitaal; Optisch; Andere